Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB624.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9501 of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 9501. Adjustment.(a) General rule.--The following shall apply:(1) If, in the construction, reconstruction, widening or relocation of a State highway, bridge or tunnel or a part of a State highway, bridge or tunnel, it becomes necessary, in the opinion of the Department of Transportation, to change, alter, adjust or relocate a water line or sanitary sewer owned and operated by a public utility, as defined in 66 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions), or infrastructure of a local exchange telecommunications company cable television system or provider of telecommunications services, the 123456789101112131415161718 department may, with the written agreement of the public utility or owner of the infrastructure, make the change, alteration, adjustment or relocation as may be required as a part of the construction, reconstruction, widening or relocation.(2) In addition to paragraph (1), the department may also enter into agreements with the public utility or owner of the infrastructure for the sharing of costs of the change, alteration, adjustment or relocation. If, in the opinion of the department, the costs should be shared by the department and [a] the public utility or owner of the infrastructure and the department is unable to agree with the public utility or owner of the infrastructure to a division of costs, the department may proceed with the work and petition the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission for a determination of the costs to be borne by each party.(b) Declaration of policy.--[A] The public utility or owner of the infrastructure under subsection (a) shall be entitled to a reimbursement in a similar manner as a city, borough, incorporated town, township and municipal authority under section 412.1 of the act of June 1, 1945 (P.L.1242, No.428), known as the State Highway Law.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0624PN0635 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223